Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE C. STATE ACCOUNTING, FISCAL MANAGEMENT, AND PRODUCTIVITY

CHAPTER 2110. STATE AGENCY ADVISORY COMMITTEES

Sec. 2110.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "advisory committee" means a committee, council, commission, task force, or other entity with multiple members that has as its primary function advising a state agency in the executive branch of state government.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 16.01(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1158, Sec. 45, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2110.0011. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. This chapter applies unless and to the extent:

(1) another state law specifically states that this chapter does not apply; or

(2) a federal law or regulation:

(A) imposes an unconditional requirement that irreconcilably conflicts with this chapter; or

(B) imposes a condition on the state's eligibility to receive money from the federal government that irreconcilably conflicts with this chapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1158, Sec. 46, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2110.0012. ESTABLISHMENT OF ADVISORY COMMITTEES. For purposes of this chapter, a state agency has established an advisory committee if:

(1) state or federal law has specifically created the committee to advise the agency; or

(2) the agency has, under state or federal law, created the committee to advise the agency.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1158, Sec. 46, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2110.002. COMPOSITION OF ADVISORY COMMITTEES. (a) An advisory committee must be composed of a reasonable number of members not to exceed 24.

(b) The composition of an advisory committee that advises a state agency regarding an industry or occupation regulated or directly affected by the agency must provide a balanced representation between:

(1) the industry or occupation; and

(2) consumers of services provided by the agency, industry, or occupation.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 594 (S.B. 604), Sec. 1.08(1), eff. September 1, 2019.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 16.01(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1158, Sec. 47, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1290 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 43, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 594 (S.B. 604), Sec. 1.08(1), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 2110.003. PRESIDING OFFICER. (a) An advisory committee shall select from among its members a presiding officer.

(b) The presiding officer shall preside over the advisory committee and report to the advised state agency.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 16.01(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1158, Sec. 48, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2110.004. REIMBURSEMENT OF MEMBERS' EXPENSES; APPROPRIATIONS PROCESS. (a) Notwithstanding other law, the manner and amount of reimbursement for expenses, including travel expenses, of members of an advisory committee may be prescribed only:

(1) by the General Appropriations Act; or

(2) through the budget execution process under Chapter 317 if the advisory committee is created after it is practicable to address the existence of the committee in the General Appropriations Act.

(b) A state agency that is advised by an advisory committee must request authority to reimburse the expenses of members of the committee through the appropriations or budget execution process, as appropriate, if the agency determines that the expenses of committee members should be reimbursed. The request must:

(1) identify the costs related to the advisory committee's existence, including the cost of agency staff time spent in support of the committee's activities;

(2) state the reasons the advisory committee should continue in existence; and

(3) identify any other advisory committees created to advise the agency that should be consolidated or abolished.

(c) As part of the appropriations and budget execution process, the governor and the Legislative Budget Board shall jointly identify advisory committees that should be abolished. The comptroller may recommend to the governor and the Legislative Budget Board that an advisory committee should be abolished.

(d) The General Appropriations Act may provide for reimbursing the expenses of members of certain advisory committees without providing for reimbursing the expenses of members of other advisory committees.

(e) This section does not apply to an advisory committee the services of which are determined by the governing board of a retirement system trust fund to be necessary for the performance of the governing board's fiduciary duties under the state constitution.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 16.01(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 2110.005. AGENCY-DEVELOPED STATEMENT OF PURPOSE AND TASKS; REPORTING REQUIREMENTS. A state agency that establishes an advisory committee shall by rule:

(1) state the purpose and tasks of the committee; and

(2) describe the manner in which the committee will report to the agency.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 16.01(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1158, Sec. 49, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2110.006. AGENCY EVALUATION OF COMMITTEE COSTS AND EFFECTIVENESS. A state agency that has established an advisory committee shall evaluate annually:

(1) the committee's work;

(2) the committee's usefulness; and

(3) the costs related to the committee's existence, including the cost of agency staff time spent in support of the committee's activities.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 16.01(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1158, Sec. 50, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2110.007. REPORT TO THE LEGISLATIVE BUDGET BOARD. A state agency that has established an advisory committee shall report to the Legislative Budget Board the information developed in the evaluation required by Section 2110.006. The agency shall file the report biennially in connection with the agency's request for appropriations.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 16.01(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1158, Sec. 51, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 2110.008. DURATION OF ADVISORY COMMITTEES. (a) A state agency that has established an advisory committee may designate the date on which the committee will automatically be abolished. The designation must be by rule. The committee may continue in existence after that date only if the agency amends the rule to provide for a different abolishment date.

(b) Unless the state agency that establishes an advisory committee designates a different date under Subsection (a), the committee is automatically abolished on the later of:

(1) September 1, 2005; or

(2) the fourth anniversary of the date of its creation.

(c) An advisory committee that state or federal law has specifically created as described in Section 2110.0012(1) is considered for purposes of Subsection (b)(2) to have been created on the effective date of that law unless the law specifically provides for a different date of creation.

(d) This section does not apply to an advisory committee that has a specific duration prescribed by statute.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 16.01(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1158, Sec. 52, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.